Maryland, session 2026, HB1629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–402.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ASAM LEVEL 3.1 SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1629*

HOUSE BILL 1629
7.5–601 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “TREATMENT PROGRAM” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT:
(I) PROVIDES TREATMENT, CARE, OR REHABILITATION FOR
PATIENTS WHO SHOW THE EFFECTS OF DRUG OR ALCOHOL ABUSE;
(II) REPRESENTS OR ADVERTISES ITSELF AS AN ALCOHOL OR
OTHER DRUG ABUSE TREATMENT PROGRAM; AND
(III) IS REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CERTIFICATION FROM THE
ADMINISTRATION TO PROVIDE DRUG AND ALCOHOL TREATMENT SERVICES IN THE
STATE.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH BY REGULATION
STANDARDS FOR THE DISCHARGE OF PATIENTS FROM TREATMENT PROGRAMS.
(2) THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN REGULATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) REQUIRE THAT A DISCHARGE FROM A TREATMENT
PROGRAM BE APPROPRIATE FOR THE PATIENT’S MENTAL HEALTH OR SUBSTANCE
USE DISORDER DIAGNOSIS;
(II) 1. PROHIBIT A TREATMENT PROGRAM FROM
DISCHARGING THE PATIENT IF THE PATIENT:
A. WILL BE HOMELESS OR RESIDE IN A HOMELESS
SHELTER ON DISCHARGE; AND
B. NEEDS TO RECEIVE CARE IN A RESIDENTIAL
PROGRAM BASED ON THE ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED OR UNDER THE TREATMENT
PLAN PREPARED FOR THE PATIENT; AND
2. REQUIRE A TREATMENT PROGRAM TO REFER THE
PATIENT WHO MEETS THE CRITERIA UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM TO RECEIVE CARE
IN A HALFWAY HOUSE THAT PROVIDES ASAM LEVEL 3.1 SERVICES OR AN
APPROPRIATE RECOVERY RESIDENCE IF THE PATIENT IS WILLING TO RECEIVE THIS
LEVEL OF CARE;
(III) BEFORE OR AT THE TIME OF DISCHARGE, REQUIRE A
TREATMENT PROGRAM TO REFER AND FACILITATE ENTRY OF A PATIENT INTO A
PROGRAM OR SERVICE IDENTIFIED AS A NEED FOR THE PATIENT UNDER THE

HOUSE BILL 1629 3
ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED OR UNDER THE TREATMENT PLAN PREPARED FOR THE
PATIENT, INCLUDING PROGRAMS OR SERVICES TO:
1. ADDRESS NEEDS RELATING TO:
A. PHYSICAL AND MENTAL HEALTH;
B. EMPLOYMENT OR FINANCIAL SUPPORT;
C. DRUG AND ALCOHOL TREATMENT AT THE ASAM
LEVEL APPROPRIATE FOR THE PATIENT;
D. LEGAL REPRESENTATION AND ASSISTANCE;
E. FAMILY AND SOCIAL MATTERS; AND
F. EDUCATION; AND
2. PROVIDE APPROPRIATE INDIVIDUALIZED
INTERVENTIONS FOR THE PATIENT, INCLUDING:
A. SHORT– AND LONG–RANGE TREATMENT;
B. CLINICAL SERVICES, INCLUDING INDIVIDUAL,
GROUP, AND FAMILY COUNSELING;
C. SELF–HELP GROUPS; AND
D. OTHER ANCILLARY SERVICES SPECIFIED IN THE
TREATMENT PLAN;
(IV) IF THE PATIENT IS TRANSITIONING FROM ONE
RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT PROGRAM TO ANOTHER RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT
PROGRAM, REQUIRE THAT THE REFERRAL FOR ANY OUTPATIENT SERVICES LISTED
UNDER ITEM (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND NOT PROVIDED BY THE RECEIVING
TREATMENT PROGRAM BE IN PLACE BEFORE THE TRANSFER OF THE PATIENT TO
THE RECEIVING TREATMENT PROGRAM; AND
(V) IF THE PATIENT IS TRANSITIONING TO A HOMELESS
SHELTER, REQUIRE THAT THE REFERRAL FOR ANY OUTPATIENT SERVICES LISTED
UNDER ITEM (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND NOT PROVIDED BY THE HOMELESS
SHELTER BE IN PLACE BEFORE THE TRANSFER OF THE PATIENT TO THE HOMELESS
SHELTER.

HOUSE BILL 1629
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO:
(I) AN ASAM LEVEL 3.3 CLINICALLY MANAGED
MEDIUM–INTENSITY TREATMENT PROGRAM; AND
(II) AN ASAM LEVEL 3.5 CLINICALLY MANAGED
HIGH–INTENSITY RESIDENTIAL PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH BY REGULATION
STANDARDS FOR REFERRAL SERVICES OFFERED TO PATIENTS BY TREATMENT
PROGRAMS SUBJECT TO THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) 1. REQUIRE A TREATMENT PROGRAM TO IMPLEMENT AN
AGREEMENT REFERRING A PATIENT TO RECEIVE SERVICES WITHIN 3 WORKING
DAYS AFTER SIGNING AN INDIVIDUALIZED TREATMENT PLAN WHEN THE PLAN
INCLUDES REFERRAL SERVICES FOR:
A. MEDICAL CARE;
B. SERVICES THROUGH THE MARYLAND DIVISION OF
REHABILITATION SERVICES;
C. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES;
D. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT;
E. LEGAL REPRESENTATION OR ASSISTANCE;
F. FAMILY SERVICES; OR
G. SOCIAL SERVICES; AND
2. REQUIRE THE INDIVIDUALIZED TREATMENT PLAN TO
INCLUDE A PLAN FOR HOW THE PATIENT WILL ACCESS THE SERVICES LISTED UNDER
ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM; AND
(II) REQUIRE THAT TREATMENT PROGRAM REFERRAL
AGREEMENTS REMAIN VALID IN THE EVENT OF A PATIENT’S DISCHARGE FROM A
TREATMENT PROGRAM TO ENSURE THE CONTINUITY OF RECEIPT OF THE REFERRAL

HOUSE BILL 1629 5
SERVICES BY THE PATIENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the Maryland Department of Health shall submit a report to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly that
includes:
(1) the status of the adoption and revision of regulations to implement the
requirements of this Act and Chapter 580 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2017; and
(2) a plan for the enforcement of the statutory and regulatory requirements
under this Act and Chapter 580 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2017.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.